Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1220
Act; exemptions.

The following are exempt from the licensing requirements of the Emergency Medical Services Practice Act:

(1) The occasional use of a vehicle or aircraft not designated as an ambulance and not ordinarily used in transporting patients or operating emergency care, rescue, or resuscitation services;

(2) Vehicles or aircraft rendering services as an ambulance in case of a major catastrophe or emergency when licensed ambulances based in the localities of the catastrophe or emergency are incapable of rendering the services required;

(3) Ambulances from another state which are operated from a location or headquarters outside of this state in order to transport patients across state lines, but no such ambulance shall be used to pick up patients within this state for transportation to locations within this state except in case of an emergency;

(4) Ambulances or emergency vehicles owned and operated by an agency of the United States Government and the personnel of such agency;

(5) Except for the provisions of section 38-1232, physicians, physician assistants, registered nurses, or advanced practice registered nurses, who hold current Nebraska licenses and are exclusively engaged in the practice of their respective professions;

(6) Persons authorized to perform emergency care in other states when incidentally working in Nebraska in response to an emergency situation; and

(7) Students under the supervision of (a) a licensed emergency care provider performing emergency medical services that are an integral part of the training provided by an approved training agency or (b) an organization accredited by the Commission on Accreditation of Allied Health Education Programs for the level of training the student is completing.

Laws 1997, LB 138, § 20;

Laws 2000, LB 1115, § 76;

Laws 2005, LB 256, § 94;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-5191;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 504;

Laws 2019, LB135, § 1;

Laws 2020, LB1002, § 32.